Washington statutes.
RCW 42.41.045

Prohibition on intimidation of whistleblower—Nondisclosure of protected information.

(1) A local government official or employee may not use his or her official authority or influence, directly or indirectly, to threaten, intimidate, or coerce an employee for the purpose of interfering with that employee's right to disclose information concerning an improper governmental action in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Nothing in this section authorizes an individual to disclose information prohibited by law.

[ 1994 c 210 s 2.]